.ipynb_checkpoints/bhojpuri-checkpoint.dix
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ॊऀँंःऄअआइईउऊऋऌऍऎएऐऑऒओऔकखगघङचछजझञटठडढणतथदधनऩपफबभमयरऱलळऴवशषसहऺऻ़ऽािीुूृॄॅॆेैॉॊोौ्ॎॏॐ॒॑॓॔ॕॖॗक़ख़ग़ज़ड़ढ़फ़य़ॠॡॢॣॱॲॳॴॵॶॷॸॹॺॻॼॽॾ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun" />
  	<sdef n="np" c="Proper noun" />
	<sdef n="na" c="Abstract noun" />
  	<sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym" />
  	<sdef n="al" c="Altres" />
  	<sdef n="cog" c="Cognomen" />

  </sdefs>

 <pardefs>

  
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l /><r><s n="num" /></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?</re><p><l /><r><s n="num" /></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>([५६७८९]|[१२३४५६७८९][०१२३४५६७८९]+)</re><p><l><b />वाँ</l><r><s n="adj" /><s n="ord" /></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?%</re><p><l /><r><s n="num" /><s n="percent" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!।॥]</re><p><l /><r><s n="sent" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l /><r><s n="guio" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l /><r><s n="cm" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l /><r><s n="lquot" /></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l /><r><s n="rquot" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l /><r><s n="lpar" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l /><r><s n="rpar" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="__abbr">
      
      <e>     <p><l>इ</l><r>इ.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>इ.</l><r>इ.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>आदी</l><r>इ.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>

      
      <e>     <p><l>डॉ</l><r>डॉ.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>डॉ.</l><r>डॉ.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>

      
      <e>     <p><l>किमी</l><r>किमी.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>किमी.</l><r>किमी.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>

      
      <e>     <p><l>फ्र</l><r>फ्र.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>फ्र.</l><r>फ्र.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>

      
      <e>     <p><l>रु</l><r>रु.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>रु.</l><r>रु.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>

      
      <e>     <p><l>पीएच</l><r>पीएच.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>पीएच.</l><r>पीएच.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>

      
      <e>     <p><l>ई</l><r>ई.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई.</l><r>ई.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>

      
      <e>     <p><l>श्री</l><r>श्री.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>श्री.</l><r>श्री.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>

      
      <e>     <p><l>ई<b />पू</l><r>ई. पू.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ई.<b />पू</l><r>ई. पू.<s n="abbr" /></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="__inj">
      <e>     <p><l>ए</l><r>ए<s n="inj" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>शाबाश</l><r>शाबाश<s n="inj" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>धन्य</l><r>धन्य<s n="inj" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>रे</l><r>रे<s n="inj" /></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ओ</l><r>ओ<s n="inj" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    

    
    <pardef n="__gen_endings">
        <e><p><l>का</l><r>का<s n="post" /><s n="gen" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="post" /><s n="gen" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post" /><s n="gen" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post" /><s n="gen" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>




    <pardef n="खडा/ऊँ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ऊँ</l><r>ऊँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ऊँ</l><r>ऊँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obl" /></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ऊँ</l><r>ऊँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उँओं</l><r>ऊँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obl" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

</pardefs>

    <e><par n="coma" /></e>
    <e><par n="separa" /></e>
    <e><par n="guio" /></e>
    <e><par n="numeros" /></e>
    <e><par n="paresq" /></e>
    <e><par n="pardret" /></e>
    <e><par n="quotes" /></e>
